Ohio, session 136, SB46.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.2219 of the Revised Code be 4
amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.2219. The month of March is designated as 6
"Colorectal Cancer Screening and Awareness Month." 7
Section 2. That existing section 5.2219 of the Revised 8
Code is hereby repealed. 9